Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 11.3 State-Wide Early Reading Success Institute

16-11.3-1.
Panel established.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall convene an early reading success panel composed of elementary school teachers, school administrators, national experts in the field of reading research, and early childhood and higher education experts knowledgeable in the field of reading research. The panel shall review research on how reading is learned and on the knowledge and skills necessary for teachers to deliver effective reading instruction by July 1, 2001.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 278, § 1.

16-11.3-2.
Reading success institute.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop, within available appropriations, a state-wide early reading success institute for educators based on the review completed by the early reading success panel pursuant to §

16-11.3-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 278, § 1.